Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0279.
people of the state of michigan enact: TITLE An act relating to the economic development of this state; to create the Michigan strategic fund and to prescribe its powers and duties; to transfer and provide for the acquisition and succession to the rights, properties, obligations, and duties of the job development authority and the Michigan economic development authority to the Michigan strategic fund; to provide for the expenditure of proceeds in certain funds to which the Michigan strategic fund succeeds in ownership; to provide for the issuance of, and terms and conditions for, certain notes and bonds of the Michigan strategic fund; to create certain boards and funds; to create certain permanent funds; to exempt the property, income, and operation of the fund and its bonds and notes, and the interest thereon, from certain taxes; to provide for the creation of certain centers and offices within and for the purposes of the Michigan strategic fund; to provide for the creation and funding of certain accounts for certain purposes; to impose certain powers and duties upon certain officials, departments, and authorities of this state; to make certain loans, grants, and investments; to provide penalties; to make an appropriation; and to repeal acts and parts of acts. CHAPTER 7A Sec. 79a. As used in this chapter: (a) "Business permitting support fund" means the business permitting support fund created in section 79c. (b) "Michigan business" means a business that is located in or operates in this state or will be located in or will operate in this state, as determined by the fund. (c) "Office" means the office of business permitting support created in section 79b. (d) "Permit" means any permit, license, certification, or other discretionary approval issued by a state agency. (e) "State agency" means a department, board, commission, office, agency, authority, or other unit of state government. Sec. 79b. (1) The office of business permitting support is created in the fund. (2) The fund shall operate the office and may hire not more than 5 full-time equivalent employees for the office. (3) The office shall do all of the following: (a) Assist Michigan businesses with navigating the requirements for and obtaining state permits. (b) Work with other state agencies to create an integrated and coordinated permitting system and to streamline the permitting process for Michigan businesses. (c) Develop resources by industry and activity to enable Michigan businesses to obtain permitting information relevant to a type of business or particular activity from a single source. (d) Create and operate a website for Michigan businesses that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (i) Contact information for the office. (ii) Step-by-step instructions on the governmental requirements of how to start and operate a business in this state. (iii) The resources developed under subdivision (c). Sec. 79c. (1) The business permitting support fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from appropriations for the office or from any other source in the business permitting support fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the business permitting support fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the business permitting support fund. (3) Money in the business permitting support fund at the close of a fiscal year remains in the business permitting support fund and does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The fund is the administrator of the business permitting support fund for audits of the business permitting support fund. (5) The fund shall expend money from the business permitting support fund, on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) Operation of the office. (b) To otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter. Sec. 79d. A state agency that issues permits shall do all of the following: (a) Provide information requested by the office to carry out the purposes of this chapter. (b) Coordinate with the office with respect to the issuance of permits to Michigan businesses. (c) Cooperate with the office to fulfill the requirements of section 79b(3). Sec. 79e. Not later than 30 days after the end of the fiscal year, the office shall submit a written report to the governor and each house of the legislature. The written report under this section must include all of the following: (a) A description of the office's activities under this chapter. (b) Recommendations for improvements to this state's permitting processes to make those permitting processes less burdensome for Michigan businesses.